Hawaii statutes.
§128E-2 Designation and functions of the
Hawaii state emergency response commission. (a) There is created the
Hawaii state emergency response commission, which shall be placed within the
department for administrative purposes and carry out the requirements of this
chapter.

(b) The commission shall consist of the
following members, who shall be appointed by the governor as provided in
section 26-34:

(1) The director of health;

(2) The chairperson of the board of agriculture;

(3) The adjutant general;

(4) The director of labor and industrial relations;

(5) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources;

(6) The director of the office of environmental
quality control;

(7) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism;

(8) The director of transportation;

(9) The dean of the University of Hawaii school of
public health or the dean of the University of Hawaii school of medicine, as
determined by the governor;

(10) The director of the environmental center of the
University of Hawaii;

(11) One representative from each committee designated
by the mayor of each respective county; and

(12) Other persons appointed by the governor to meet
the minimum requirements of the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know
Act of 1986.

(c) A state officer who serves as a member of
the commission may designate, in writing, another person to act in place of the
officer. The designated person shall have all the powers of a commission
member.

(d) The director shall be the chairperson of
the commission. A vice-chairperson shall be designated by the chairperson to
serve in the chairperson's absence. The chairperson or the vice-chairperson
may assign, delegate, or transfer tasks, duties, and responsibilities to
members of the commission.

(e) Commission members shall serve without
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses,
including travel expenses, incurred in carrying out their duties.

(f) Commission and committee support personnel
shall be supervised and administered by the chairperson as the primary agent
responsible for performing the functions and duties of the commission. The
department shall employ such professional, technical, administrative, and other
staff personnel as may be deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

(g) The commission shall:

(1) Carry out the duties and responsibilities of a
state emergency response commission as specified in the Emergency Planning and
Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986;

(2) Develop state contingency plans relating to the
implementation of this chapter;

(3) Supervise, coordinate, and provide staff support
to the committees for the implementation of this chapter and the Emergency
Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986;

(4) Develop a public information, education, and
participation program for the public and facility owners covering the
requirements of this chapter, and the interpretation of the chemical
information collected pursuant to this chapter and the risks that these chemicals
pose to the public health and environment;

(5) Appoint the members of the committees;

(6) Develop a state chemical inventory form to be
used in lieu of the federal Tier II form and chemical list requirements; and

(7) Do all other things necessary for the
implementation of this chapter and the requirements of the Emergency Planning
and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986. [L 1993, c 300, pt of §1; am L
2002, c 60, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next